Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-8404
Act; not construed as right to abortion.

Nothing in the Mandate
Opt-Out and Insurance Coverage Clarification Act shall be construed as creating
a right to an abortion.

Laws 2011, LB22, § 4.